Hawaii statutes.
§321-222 Definitions. As used in this
part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Advanced life support" means
initiating all basic life support care as well as invasive patient care
designed to stabilize and support a patient's condition due to sudden illness
or injury. The care rendered, excluding basic life support, constitutes the
practice of medicine.

"Advisory committee" means the
emergency medical services advisory committee.

"Basic life support" means initiating
noninvasive emergency patient care designed to optimize the patient's chances
of surviving the emergency situation. The care rendered consists of all first
aid procedures needed, but does not include invasive procedures which
constitute the practice of medicine; provided that state-approved basic life
support personnel may use fully automatic external defibrillators, initiate
intravenous lines, and perform manual external defibrillation under the
direction and personal supervision of a mobile intensive care technician and in
accordance with rules adopted by the department.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Emergency aeromedical services"
means a secondary response system that provides immediate critical care and
transport by rotary-wing aircraft of a patient to a facility that provides
specialized medical care.

"Emergency medical services for
children" means comprehensive emergency medical services including
preventive, pre-hospital, hospital, rehabilitative, and other post-hospital
care for children.

"Emergency medical services
personnel" means any mobile intensive care technician or emergency medical
technician who is certified or licensed by the State.

"First responder personnel" means a
person who has successfully completed a United States Department of Transportation
approved First Responder Course of training in emergency basic life support.

"State system" means the state
comprehensive pre-hospital emergency medical services system. [L 1978, c 148,
pt of §1; am L 1980, c 285, §1; am L 1981, c 93, §2; am L 1991, c 115, §1; am L
1994, c 173, §2 and c 242, §2; am L Sp 2003, c 2, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next